District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

39-111

Duties of the Task Force.

Repealed.

History

June 3, 1896, 29 Stat. 244, ch. 315, § 11
as added Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-78, § 2, 53 DCR 802
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 265(c), 62 DCR 1884

Section References

This section is referenced in § 39-113.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 265(c) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 265(c) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).